Utah statutes.
62A-7-203.   Detention -- Physical facilities.

The division may issue requests for proposals to allow for the private construction of facilities suitable to meet the detention requirements of any county or group of counties, subject to approval by the governor.  The governor shall furnish an analysis of the benefits of the proposals received to the Infrastructure and General Government Appropriations Subcommittee for its review.

